Washington statutes.
RCW 11.103.040

Trustor's powers—Powers of withdrawal.

While the trustor of a revocable trust is living, the rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the trustor. If a revocable trust has more than one trustor, the duties of the trustee are owed to all of the living trustors having the right to revoke the trust.

[ 2013 c 272 s 19; 2011 c 327 s 37.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.